Utah, session 2026, SB274.
Section 1. Section 53F-2-424 is enacted to read:53F-2-424. Supplemental funding for literacy coaching.(1)As used in this section, "benchmark reading assessment" means the assessment described in Section 53E-4-307.(2)(a)If the average student performance within an LEA on the benchmark reading assessment is below the statewide average on the benchmark reading assessment, the state board shall provide additional funding to the LEA to provide additional literacy coaching support, as described in Section 53E-3-1002, in the following amounts:(i)except as provided in Subsection (1)(b), an amount equivalent to half of a full-time employee; and(ii)for an LEA with fewer than 300 students that demonstrates below typical growth on the assessment, an amount equivalent to one full-time employee.(b)If the average student performance within a school on the benchmark reading assessment described in Section 53E-4-307 is below the statewide average on the benchmark reading assessment and the students demonstrate, on average, well below typical growth on the benchmark reading assessment, the state board shall provide additional funding to the school to provide additional literacy coaching support, as described in Section 53E-3-1002, in an amount equivalent to one full-time employee.(3)The state board shall distribute funding described in Subsection (2) based on benchmark reading assessment data from the year preceding the relevant fiscal year.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on July 1, 2026.